Oklahoma, session 2025, SB111.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1158, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1158. A. On and after July 1, 2002, any person, before
engaging in the installation of individual sewage disposal systems,
shall first obtain certification from the Department of
Environmental Quality under such rules as may be promulgated by the
Environmental Quality Board. The provisions of this subsection
shall only apply to persons who install more than ten one individual
sewage disposal systems system per calendar year. As used in this
section, “individual sewage disposal systems system” means a sewage
disposal system that serves an individual residence or duplex and is
not available for use by the general public.
B. Environmental Specialists specialists employed by the
Department of Environmental Quality may perform soil profile
descriptions to design individual and other subsurface sewage
disposal systems. Any other individual choosing to perform soil
profile descriptions to design individual and other subsurface
sewage disposal systems shall first be certified by the Department

of Environmental Quality under such rules as may be promulgated by
the Environmental Quality Board.
C. The Environmental Quality Board shall promulgate rules that
shall include, but not be limited to, the following:
1. Establishment of minimum requirements for each type of
certification;
2. Establishment of a procedure and schedule for the assessment
of penalties for failure to comply with this section or rules
promulgated pursuant thereto;
3. Establishment of procedures for suspension, revocation, and
nonrenewal of a certification; and
4. A requirement that an annual fee, as set by the
Environmental Quality Board pursuant to Section 2-3-402 of Title 27A
of the Oklahoma Statutes, shall be paid to the Department of
Environmental Quality for each certification.
D. The Water Quality Management Advisory Council shall
recommend proposed rules to the Environmental Quality Board pursuant
to Section 2-2-201 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma Statutes.
E. The Department of Environmental Quality may, after notice
and opportunity for a hearing pursuant to the Administrative
Procedures Act, assess administrative penalties and may revoke,
suspend, or deny renewal of a certification pursuant to Section 2-3-
502 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma Statutes for any violation of this
section or rules promulgated pursuant thereto. Such administrative
penalties shall be deposited as provided in Section 2-3-401 of Title
27A of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 111 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 12th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 30th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 111 Page 3